Washington statutes.
RCW 4.24.070

Recovery of money lost at gambling.

All persons losing money or anything of value at or on any illegal gambling games shall have a cause of action to recover from the dealer or player winning, or from the proprietor for whose benefit such game was played or dealt, or such money or things of value won, the amount of the money or the value of the thing so lost.

[ 1957 c 7 s 2; Code 1881 s 1255; 1879 p 98 s 3; RRS s 5851.]

NOTES:

Gambling: Chapter 9.46 RCW.